Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 3. Water Quality
§ 35-11-312.
Fees.

The department shall implement a surface water point source discharge permit fee system for each permit issued pursuant to W.S. 35-11-302(a)(v). The department shall assess an annual permit fee of two hundred dollars ($200.00) for each Wyoming pollution discharge elimination system permit and for each permit authorization held by any person under W.S.

35-11-301

. All payment of permit fees shall be received prior to processing and issuance of the permit. Permit fees shall not be prorated and are nonrefundable upon permit modification, termination or expiration. The department shall prepare a biennium report on the fee system for review by the joint minerals, business and economic development interim committee by October 31 of the year prior to the Wyoming legislative budget session.

The fees collected by the department pursuant to this section shall be deposited in a separate account, and shall be subject to appropriation by the legislature to the department to be used for costs associated with:

Surface water quality monitoring and analysis;

Surface water quality modeling analysis and demonstrations;

Other nonoperating costs associated with surface water discharges.

The revenue generated by this section shall not be used for operational costs associated with permit processing.

History.

Laws 2004, ch. 60, § 1; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2007, ch. 178, § 1; 2013 ch. 181, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2020 ch. 38, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, deleted “within the earmarked revenue fund” in (b).

The 2007 amendment,

in (a) substituted “January 1” for “July 1.”

Laws 2007, ch. 178, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2007.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, in (a), substituted “permit issued pursuant to W.S. 35-11-302(a)(v)” for “national pollutant discharge elimination system permit” in the first sentence, in the second sentence, deleted “On January 1 of each year” from the beginning, substituted “Wyoming pollution” for “national pollutant,” and deleted “during any portion of the preceding twelve (12) month period” at the end, and added the third and fourth sentences.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (a) substituted “two hundred dollars ($200.00)” for “one hundred dollars ($100.00).”

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2007, ch. 178, § 2, states as follows: “The department of environmental quality shall assess and collect the full annual fee on July 1, 2007 and shall assess and collect one-half (1/2) of the annual fee on January 1, 2008 and the full fee annually thereafter.”

Effective date. —

Laws 2004, ch. 60, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2004.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 35-11-313.
Carbon sequestration; permit requirements. [Effective until July 1, 2023]

The geologic sequestration of carbon dioxide is prohibited unless authorized by a permit issued by the department.

The injection of carbon dioxide for purposes of a project for enhanced recovery of oil or other minerals approved by the Wyoming oil and gas conservation commission shall not be subject to the provisions of this chapter.

If an oil and gas operator converts to geologic sequestration upon the cessation of oil and gas recovery operations, or injects carbon dioxide for the primary purpose of long term storage that results in an increased risk to an underground source of drinking water as compared to enhanced oil recovery operations, then regulation of the geologic sequestration facility and the geologic sequestration site shall be transferred to the department. If the oil and gas operator does not convert to geologic sequestration, the wells shall be plugged and abandoned according to the rules of the Wyoming oil and gas conservation commission. When determining whether an oil and gas recovery operation is injecting carbon dioxide for the primary purpose of long term storage that results in an increased risk to an underground source of drinking water as compared to enhanced oil recovery operations, the director shall consider the findings and recommendations of the supervisor of the Wyoming oil and gas conservation commission. The supervisor shall make his determination following a hearing of the oil and gas conservation commission examiners held under the commission’s rules and regulations promulgated under Title 30, Chapter 5 of the Wyoming statutes. The supervisor shall provide the operator and director with notice of the supervisor’s findings and recommendations under this subsection and an opportunity for a public hearing before the Wyoming oil and gas conservation commission. Within fifteen (15) days of receiving notice as provided in this subsection, the operator may request a hearing before the Wyoming oil and gas conservation commission. If both a change in primary purpose to long term storage and an increased risk to an underground source of drinking water as compared to enhanced oil recovery operations are found to have occurred, the commission shall recommend transfer of regulation of the operation to the department.

Temporary time limited permits for pilot scale testing of technologies for geologic sequestration shall be issued by the department based upon current rules and regulations.

Permit requirements for geologic sequestration of carbon dioxide shall be as defined by department rules.

The administrator of the water quality division of the department of environmental quality, after receiving public comment and after consultation with the state geologist, the Wyoming oil and gas conservation commission and the advisory board created under this act, shall recommend to the director rules, regulations and standards for:

The creation of subclasses of wells within the existing Underground Injection Control (UIC) program administered by the United States Environmental Protection Agency under Part C of the Safe Drinking Water Act to protect human health, safety and the environment and allow for the permitting of the geologic sequestration of carbon dioxide;

Requirements for the content of applications for geologic sequestration permits. Such applications shall include:

A description of the general geology of the area to be affected by the injection of carbon dioxide including geochemistry, structure and faulting, fracturing and seals, stratigraphy and lithology including petrophysical attributes;

A characterization of the injection zone and aquifers above and below the injection zone which may be affected including applicable pressure and fluid chemistry data to describe the projected effects of injection activities;

The identification of all other drill holes and operating wells that exist within and adjacent to the proposed sequestration site;

An assessment of the impact to fluid resources, on subsurface structures and the surface of lands that may reasonably be expected to be impacted and the measures required to mitigate such impacts;

Plans and procedures for environmental surveillance and excursion detection, prevention and control programs. For purposes of this section, “excursion” shall mean the detection of migrating carbon dioxide at or beyond the boundary of the geologic sequestration site;

A site and facilities description, including a description of the proposed geologic sequestration facilities and documentation sufficient to demonstrate that the applicant has all legal rights, including but not limited to the right to surface use, necessary to sequester carbon dioxide and associated constituents into the proposed geologic sequestration site. The department may issue a draft permit contingent on obtaining a unitization order pursuant to W.S.

35-11-314

through

35-11-317

;

Proof that the proposed injection wells are designed at a minimum to the construction standards set forth by the department and the Wyoming oil and gas conservation commission;

A plan for periodic mechanical integrity testing of all wells;

A monitoring plan to assess the migration of the injected carbon dioxide and to insure the retention of the carbon dioxide in the geologic sequestration site;

Proof of bonding or financial assurance to ensure that geologic sequestration sites and facilities will be constructed, operated and closed in accordance with the purposes and provisions of this act and the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this act;

A detailed plan for post-closure monitoring, verification, maintenance and mitigation;

Proof of notice to surface owners, mineral claimants, mineral owners, lessees and other owners of record of subsurface interests as to the contents of such notice. Notice requirements shall at a minimum require:

The publishing of notice of the application in a newspaper of general circulation in each county of the proposed operation at weekly intervals for four (4) consecutive weeks;

A copy of the notice shall also be mailed to all surface owners, mineral claimants, mineral owners, lessees and other owners of record of subsurface interests which are located within one (1) mile of the proposed boundary of the geologic sequestration site.

A certificate issued by an insurance company authorized to do business in the United States certifying that the applicant has a public liability insurance policy in force for the geologic sequestration operations for which the permit is sought, or evidence that the applicant has satisfied other state or federal self insurance requirements. The policy shall provide for personal injury and property damage protection in an amount and for a duration as established by regulations.

Requirements for the operator to provide immediate verbal notice to the department of any excursion after the excursion is discovered, followed by written notice to all surface owners, mineral claimants, mineral owners, lessees and other owners of record of subsurface interests within thirty (30) days of when the excursion is discovered;

Procedures for the termination or modification of any applicable Underground Injection Control (UIC) permit issued under Part C of the Safe Drinking Water Act if an excursion cannot be controlled or mitigated;

Such other conditions and requirements as necessary to carry out this section;

Requirements for bonding and financial assurance for geologic sequestration facilities and geologic sequestration sites including:

Procedures to establish the type and amount of the bond or financial assurance instrument to assure that the operator faithfully performs all requirements of this chapter, complies with all rules and regulations and provides adequate financial resources to pay for mitigation or reclamation costs that the state may incur as a result of any default by the permit holder, provided that, any insurance instruments submitted for financial assurance purposes shall include the state of Wyoming as an additional insured, which inclusion shall not be deemed a waiver of sovereign immunity;

Annual or other periodic reporting by the permittee during geologic sequestration and reclamation activities to allow the administrator to confirm or adjust the amount or type of the bond or other financial assurance requirements consistent with the site, facility and operation specific risks and conditions;

Procedures to require proof of compliance from any permittee ordered by the administrator to adjust a bond or other financial assurance, including procedures for permit suspension or termination procedures following notice and an opportunity for a hearing if adequate bonding or financial assurance cannot be demonstrated;

Procedures for replacement of a bond or financial assurance instrument if notice of cancellation is provided or notice that the license to do business in Wyoming of the surety or insurance company issuing a bond or other financial assurance pursuant to this chapter is suspended or revoked;

Procedures for the director to forfeit the bond or to make a claim against any insurance instrument providing financial assurance, including the right of the attorney general to bring suit to recover costs if the bond or financial assurance is inadequate, to pay for closure, mitigation, reclamation, measurement, monitoring, verification and pollution control, where recovery is deemed possible;

Procedures, including public notice and a public hearing if requested, for the release of bonds or the termination of insurance instruments not less than ten (10) years after the date when all wells excluding monitoring wells have been appropriately plugged and abandoned, all subsurface operations and activities have ceased and all surface equipment and improvements have been removed or appropriately abandoned, or so long thereafter as necessary to obtain a completion and release certificate from the administrator certifying that plume stabilization as defined by rule has been achieved without the use of control equipment based on a minimum of three (3) consecutive years of monitoring data, and that the operator has completed site reclamation and all required monitoring and remediation sufficient to show that the carbon dioxide injected into the geologic sequestration site will not harm or present a risk to human health, safety or the environment, including drinking water supplies, consistent with the purposes of this chapter and the rules and regulations adopted by the council;

Requirements for the operator to record an affidavit in the office of the county clerk of the county or counties in which a geologic sequestration site is located, which affidavit shall be reasonably calculated to alert a person researching the title of a particular tract that such tract is underlain by a site permitted for geologic sequestration.

Requirements for fees to be paid by all permittees of geologic sequestration sites and facilities, which may include a per ton injection fee or a closure fee, during the period of injection of carbon dioxide and associated constituents into subsurface geologic formations in Wyoming, which fees shall be deposited in the geologic sequestration special revenue account created by W.S.

35-11-318

for use as provided therein.

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 52, § 3.

At the time a permit application is filed, an applicant shall pay a fee to be determined by the director based upon the estimated costs of reviewing, evaluating, processing, serving notice of an application and holding any hearings. The fee shall be credited to a separate account and shall be used by the division as required to complete the tasks necessary to process, publish and reach a decision on the permit application. Unused fees shall be returned to the applicant.

The director shall recommend to the council any changes that may be required to provide consistency and equivalency between the rules or regulations promulgated under this section and any promulgated for the regulation of carbon dioxide sequestration by the United States environmental protection agency.

The Wyoming oil and gas conservation commission shall have jurisdiction over any subsequent extraction of sequestered carbon dioxide that is intended for commercial or industrial purposes.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to create any liability by the state for failure to comply with this section.

History.

Laws 2008, ch. 30, § 1; 2009, ch. 76, § 2; 2010, ch. 52, §§ 2, 3; 2016 ch. 85, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, inserted “the Wyoming oil and gas conservation commission” in the introductory language of (f), added “The department may issue a draft permit contingent on obtaining a unitization order pursuant to W.S.

35-11-314

through

35-11-317

” at the end of (f)(ii)(F), and made a related change.

The 2010 amendment,

in (f), added (f)(ii)(O), (f)(vi) and (f)(vii); and repealed former (g), pertaining to convening a working group to develop appropriate bonding procedure and other financial assurance methods to assure adequate financial resources are provided to pay for mitigation or reclamation costs.

Laws 2010, ch. 52, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2010.

The 2016 amendment

, effective July 1, 2016, in (c), inserted “or injects carbon dioxide for the primary purpose of long term storage that results in an increased risk to an underground source of drinking water as compared to enhanced oil recovery operations” in the first sentence, and added the third and subsequent sentences.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2023, added the second sentence in (e); substituted “35-11-320” for “35-11-317” in (f)(ii)(F); substituted “35-11-320” for “35-11-317” in (f)(vii); and added (n) and (o).

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2008, Ch. 30, § 4 provides: “Nothing in this act is intended to impede or impair the ability of an oil and gas operator to inject carbon dioxide through an approved enhanced oil or gas recovery project and establish, verify, register and sell emission reduction credits associated with the project.”

Laws 2008, Ch. 30, § 5 provides: “The department of environmental quality and the oil and gas conservation commission shall submit a joint written report, on or before November 1 of each year, to the joint minerals, business and economic development and joint judiciary interim committees as to all aspects of compliance with this legislation including, but not limited to, the promulgation of rules and regulations, the formation of the working group, permitting and changes to pertinent federal regulations affecting the same.”

There is no subparagraph (f)(ii)(I) or (f)(ii)(L) or subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Laws 2022, ch. 101, § 4, provides, “The provisions of this act shall apply to all holders of permits for geologic sequestration of carbon dioxide issued under W.S.

35-11-313

and to all orders of unitization of geologic sequestration sites under W.S.

35-11-314

through

35-11-317

before, on and after the effective date of this section.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the meaning of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-11-103(a)(xiii).

Appropriations. —

Laws 2008, Ch. 30, § 3 provides: “There is appropriated two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000.00) from the general fund to the department of environmental quality for use by the working group created by W.S. 35-11-313(g) for expenses related to performing the tasks assigned it pursuant to this act. Expenses may include the costs to secure expert consultation. This appropriation shall be for the period beginning with the effective date of this act and ending June 30, 2010. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, this appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for any other purpose and any unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from this appropriation shall revert as provided by law on June 30, 2010. This appropriation shall not be included in the department's standard biennial budget request.”

Effective dates. —

Laws 2008, ch. 30, § 6, makes the act effective July 1, 2008.

§ 35-11-313.
Carbon sequestration; permit requirements. [Effective July 1, 2023]

The geologic sequestration of carbon dioxide is prohibited unless authorized by a permit issued by the department.

The injection of carbon dioxide for purposes of a project for enhanced recovery of oil or other minerals approved by the Wyoming oil and gas conservation commission shall not be subject to the provisions of this chapter.

If an oil and gas operator converts to geologic sequestration upon the cessation of oil and gas recovery operations, or injects carbon dioxide for the primary purpose of long term storage that results in an increased risk to an underground source of drinking water as compared to enhanced oil recovery operations, then regulation of the geologic sequestration facility and the geologic sequestration site shall be transferred to the department. If the oil and gas operator does not convert to geologic sequestration, the wells shall be plugged and abandoned according to the rules of the Wyoming oil and gas conservation commission. When determining whether an oil and gas recovery operation is injecting carbon dioxide for the primary purpose of long term storage that results in an increased risk to an underground source of drinking water as compared to enhanced oil recovery operations, the director shall consider the findings and recommendations of the supervisor of the Wyoming oil and gas conservation commission. The supervisor shall make his determination following a hearing of the oil and gas conservation commission examiners held under the commission’s rules and regulations promulgated under Title 30, Chapter 5 of the Wyoming statutes. The supervisor shall provide the operator and director with notice of the supervisor’s findings and recommendations under this subsection and an opportunity for a public hearing before the Wyoming oil and gas conservation commission. Within fifteen (15) days of receiving notice as provided in this subsection, the operator may request a hearing before the Wyoming oil and gas conservation commission. If both a change in primary purpose to long term storage and an increased risk to an underground source of drinking water as compared to enhanced oil recovery operations are found to have occurred, the commission shall recommend transfer of regulation of the operation to the department.

Temporary time limited permits for pilot scale testing of technologies for geologic sequestration shall be issued by the department based upon current rules and regulations.

Permit requirements for geologic sequestration of carbon dioxide shall be as defined by department rules. The injector of the carbon dioxide shall apply for any permit required under this section.

The administrator of the water quality division of the department of environmental quality, after receiving public comment and after consultation with the state geologist, the Wyoming oil and gas conservation commission and the advisory board created under this act, shall recommend to the director rules, regulations and standards for:

The creation of subclasses of wells within the existing Underground Injection Control (UIC) program administered by the United States Environmental Protection Agency under Part C of the Safe Drinking Water Act to protect human health, safety and the environment and allow for the permitting of the geologic sequestration of carbon dioxide;

Requirements for the content of applications for geologic sequestration permits. Such applications shall include:

A description of the general geology of the area to be affected by the injection of carbon dioxide including geochemistry, structure and faulting, fracturing and seals, stratigraphy and lithology including petrophysical attributes;

A characterization of the injection zone and aquifers above and below the injection zone which may be affected including applicable pressure and fluid chemistry data to describe the projected effects of injection activities;

The identification of all other drill holes and operating wells that exist within and adjacent to the proposed sequestration site;

An assessment of the impact to fluid resources, on subsurface structures and the surface of lands that may reasonably be expected to be impacted and the measures required to mitigate such impacts;

Plans and procedures for environmental surveillance and excursion detection, prevention and control programs. For purposes of this section, “excursion” shall mean the detection of migrating carbon dioxide at or beyond the boundary of the geologic sequestration site;

A site and facilities description, including a description of the proposed geologic sequestration facilities and documentation sufficient to demonstrate that the applicant has all legal rights, including but not limited to the right to surface use, necessary to sequester carbon dioxide and associated constituents into the proposed geologic sequestration site. The department may issue a draft permit contingent on obtaining a unitization order pursuant to W.S.

35-11-314

through

35-11-320

;

Proof that the proposed injection wells are designed at a minimum to the construction standards set forth by the department and the Wyoming oil and gas conservation commission;

A plan for periodic mechanical integrity testing of all wells;

A monitoring plan to assess the migration of the injected carbon dioxide and to insure the retention of the carbon dioxide in the geologic sequestration site;

Proof of bonding or financial assurance to ensure that geologic sequestration sites and facilities will be constructed, operated and closed in accordance with the purposes and provisions of this act and the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this act;

A detailed plan for post-closure monitoring, verification, maintenance and mitigation;

Proof of notice to surface owners, mineral claimants, mineral owners, lessees and other owners of record of subsurface interests as to the contents of such notice. Notice requirements shall at a minimum require:

The publishing of notice of the application in a newspaper of general circulation in each county of the proposed operation at weekly intervals for four (4) consecutive weeks;

A copy of the notice shall also be mailed to all surface owners, mineral claimants, mineral owners, lessees and other owners of record of subsurface interests which are located within one (1) mile of the proposed boundary of the geologic sequestration site.

A certificate issued by an insurance company authorized to do business in the United States certifying that the applicant has a public liability insurance policy in force for the geologic sequestration operations for which the permit is sought, or evidence that the applicant has satisfied other state or federal self insurance requirements. The policy shall provide for personal injury and property damage protection in an amount and for a duration as established by regulations.

Requirements for the operator to provide immediate verbal notice to the department of any excursion after the excursion is discovered, followed by written notice to all surface owners, mineral claimants, mineral owners, lessees and other owners of record of subsurface interests within thirty (30) days of when the excursion is discovered;

Procedures for the termination or modification of any applicable Underground Injection Control (UIC) permit issued under Part C of the Safe Drinking Water Act if an excursion cannot be controlled or mitigated;

Such other conditions and requirements as necessary to carry out this section;

Requirements for bonding and financial assurance for geologic sequestration facilities and geologic sequestration sites including:

Procedures to establish the type and amount of the bond or financial assurance instrument to assure that the operator faithfully performs all requirements of this chapter, complies with all rules and regulations and provides adequate financial resources to pay for mitigation or reclamation costs that the state may incur as a result of any default by the permit holder, provided that, any insurance instruments submitted for financial assurance purposes shall include the state of Wyoming as an additional insured, which inclusion shall not be deemed a waiver of sovereign immunity;

Annual or other periodic reporting by the permittee during geologic sequestration and reclamation activities to allow the administrator to confirm or adjust the amount or type of the bond or other financial assurance requirements consistent with the site, facility and operation specific risks and conditions;

Procedures to require proof of compliance from any permittee ordered by the administrator to adjust a bond or other financial assurance, including procedures for permit suspension or termination procedures following notice and an opportunity for a hearing if adequate bonding or financial assurance cannot be demonstrated;

Procedures for replacement of a bond or financial assurance instrument if notice of cancellation is provided or notice that the license to do business in Wyoming of the surety or insurance company issuing a bond or other financial assurance pursuant to this chapter is suspended or revoked;

Procedures for the director to forfeit the bond or to make a claim against any insurance instrument providing financial assurance, including the right of the attorney general to bring suit to recover costs if the bond or financial assurance is inadequate, to pay for closure, mitigation, reclamation, measurement, monitoring, verification and pollution control, where recovery is deemed possible;

Procedures, including public notice and a public hearing if requested, for the release of bonds or the termination of insurance instruments not less than ten (10) years after the date when all wells excluding monitoring wells have been appropriately plugged and abandoned, all subsurface operations and activities have ceased and all surface equipment and improvements have been removed or appropriately abandoned, or so long thereafter as necessary to obtain a completion and release certificate from the administrator certifying that plume stabilization as defined by rule has been achieved without the use of control equipment based on a minimum of three (3) consecutive years of monitoring data, and that the operator has completed site reclamation and all required monitoring and remediation sufficient to show that the carbon dioxide injected into the geologic sequestration site will not harm or present a risk to human health, safety or the environment, including drinking water supplies, consistent with the purposes of this chapter and the rules and regulations adopted by the council;

Requirements for the operator to record an affidavit in the office of the county clerk of the county or counties in which a geologic sequestration site is located, which affidavit shall be reasonably calculated to alert a person researching the title of a particular tract that such tract is underlain by a site permitted for geologic sequestration.

Requirements for fees to be paid by all permittees of geologic sequestration sites and facilities, which may include a per ton injection fee or a closure fee, during the period of injection of carbon dioxide and associated constituents into subsurface geologic formations in Wyoming, which fees shall be deposited in the geologic sequestration special revenue account created by W.S.

35-11-320

for use as provided therein.

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 52, § 3.

At the time a permit application is filed, an applicant shall pay a fee to be determined by the director based upon the estimated costs of reviewing, evaluating, processing, serving notice of an application and holding any hearings. The fee shall be credited to a separate account and shall be used by the division as required to complete the tasks necessary to process, publish and reach a decision on the permit application. Unused fees shall be returned to the applicant.

The director shall recommend to the council any changes that may be required to provide consistency and equivalency between the rules or regulations promulgated under this section and any promulgated for the regulation of carbon dioxide sequestration by the United States environmental protection agency.

The Wyoming oil and gas conservation commission shall have jurisdiction over any subsequent extraction of sequestered carbon dioxide that is intended for commercial or industrial purposes.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to create any liability by the state for failure to comply with this section.

Upon issuing a permit, the department shall issue a certificate that includes a statement that the permit has been issued, a description of the area covered by the permit and any other information that the department deems appropriate. The injector shall file a copy of the certificate with the county clerk in the county or counties where the geologic sequestration site is located.

The provisions of W.S.

35-11-318

and

35-11-319

shall apply to any certificate for sequestration of carbon dioxide under this section and to any unitization of geologic sequestration sites under W.S.

35-11-314

through

35-11-317

.

History.

Laws 2008, ch. 30, § 1; 2009, ch. 76, § 2; 2010, ch. 52, §§ 2, 3; 2016 ch. 85, § 1, effective July 1, 2016; 2022 ch. 101, § 2, effective July 1, 2023.

§ 35-11-314.
Unitization of geologic sequestration sites; purposes; definitions. [Effective until July 1, 2023]

The purpose of W.S.

35-11-314

through

35-11-317

is declared by the Wyoming legislature to be the protection of corresponding rights, compliance with environmental requirements and to facilitate the use and production of Wyoming energy resources.

Except when context otherwise requires or when otherwise defined in this subsection, the terms used or defined in W.S.

35-11-103

, shall have the same meaning when used in W.S.

35-11-314

through

35-11-317

. When used in W.S.

35-11-314

through

35-11-317

:

“Corresponding rights” means the right of all pore space owners in a unit area who will be affected by unit operations, either now or in the future, to concurrently share in the economic benefits generated by using the pore space in the unit area.

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 76, § 1.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2023, substituted “35-11-319” for “35-11-317” in (a); substituted “35-11-320” for “35-11-317” twice in the introductory language of (b).

Editor’s notes. —

Laws 2022, ch. 101, § 4, provides, “The provisions of this act shall apply to all holders of permits for geologic sequestration of carbon dioxide issued under W.S.

35-11-313

and to all orders of unitization of geologic sequestration sites under W.S.

35-11-314

through

35-11-317

before, on and after the effective date of this section.”

§ 35-11-314.
Unitization of geologic sequestration sites; purposes; definitions. [Effective July 1, 2023]

The purpose of W.S.

35-11-314

through

35-11-319

is declared by the Wyoming legislature to be the protection of corresponding rights, compliance with environmental requirements and to facilitate the use and production of Wyoming energy resources.

Except when context otherwise requires or when otherwise defined in this subsection, the terms used or defined in W.S.

35-11-103

, shall have the same meaning when used in W.S.

35-11-314

through

35-11-320

. When used in W.S.

35-11-314

through

35-11-320

:

“Corresponding rights” means the right of all pore space owners in a unit area who will be affected by unit operations, either now or in the future, to concurrently share in the economic benefits generated by using the pore space in the unit area.

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 76, § 1; 2022 ch. 101, § 2, effective July 1, 2023.

§ 35-11-315.
Unitization of geologic sequestration sites; agreements; application for permit; contents.

Any interested person may file an application with the Wyoming oil and gas conservation commission requesting an order providing for the operation and organization of a unit of one (1) or more parts as a geologic sequestration site and for the pooling of interests in pore space in the proposed unit area for the purpose of conducting the unit operation. The application shall contain:

A copy of any permit or draft permit issued by the department allowing geologic sequestration or any application for such permit;

A description of the pore space and surface lands proposed to be so operated, termed the “unit area”;

The names, as disclosed by the conveyance records of the county or counties in which the proposed unit area is situated, and the status records of the district office of the bureau of land management of:

All persons owning or having an interest in the surface estate and pore space in the unit area including mortgages and the owners of other liens or encumbrances; and

All owners of the surface estate and pore space not included within but which immediately adjoins the proposed unit area or a corner thereof.

The addresses of all persons and owners identified in subparagraphs (iii)(A) and (B) of this subsection, if known. If the name or address of any person or owner is unknown, the application shall so indicate;

A statement of the type of operations contemplated in order to effectuate the purposes specified in W.S.

35-11-314

to comply with environmental requirements and to facilitate the use and production of Wyoming energy resources;

A proposed plan of unitization applicable to the proposed unit area which the applicant considers fair, reasonable and equitable and which shall include provisions for determining the pore space to be used within the area, the appointment of a unit operator and the time when the plan is to become effective;

A proposed plan for determining the quantity of pore space storage capacity to be assigned to each separately owned tract within the unit and the formula or method by which pore space will be allocated the economic benefits generated by use of pore space in the unit area;

A proposed plan for generating economic benefits for the use of pore space within the unit area;

A proposed operating plan providing the manner in which the unit area will be supervised and managed and, if applicable, costs allocated and paid, unless all owners within the proposed unit area have joined in executing an operating agreement or plan providing for such supervision, management and allocation and, if applicable, payment of costs. All operating plans shall comply with all applicable environmental requirements.

History.

Laws 2009, ch. 76, § 1.